Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLII Miscellaneous Practice Provisions
CHAPTER 451 Practice in Circuit Courts

451.010.
Practice, how governed — Application of chapter. [Repealed.]

451.020.
Assignment of cases for trial in certain courts. [Repealed.]

451.025.
Consolidation of actions in court having more than one civil division. [Repealed.]

451.030.
Common-law trial docket; how actions placed on. [Repealed.]

451.040.
Equity trial docket; how actions and motions placed on. [Repealed.]

451.050.
Rule docket; fee. [Repealed.]

451.060.
Month treated as term in criminal and penal actions. [Repealed.]

451.070.
Time of appearance in criminal action. [Repealed.]

451.080.
Time for defendant to answer in civil action. [Repealed.]

451.090.
Time for filing pleadings subsequent to answer. [Repealed.]

451.100.
Filing with clerk sufficient. [Repealed.]

451.110.
Revivor of action; time for objection to. [Repealed.]

451.120.
Depositions, how taken. [Repealed.]

451.130.
Control of judgment or order after rendition; vacation or modification. [Repealed.]

451.140.
Application for new trial in equity. [Repealed.]

451.150.
Bill of exceptions in criminal proceedings; transcripts in civil actions. [Repealed.]

451.160.
Appeal. [Repealed.]

451.170.
Terms of judicial sales.

Judicial sales of property shall be for cash, or on reasonable credit or partly for cash and partly on reasonable credit, as the court directs; but a sale of personal property shall not be on a longer credit than four (4) months.

The court may by rule require purchasers at judicial sales to deposit with the officers making the sale, at the time of sale, a specified sum of money, sufficient to cover the expense of a resale. If the deposit is not made at that time, the officer shall at once resell the property.

History.

1002, 1010.

451.180.
Bond of purchaser at judicial sale, to whom made payable — Enforcement.

The bond given by a purchaser of property at a judicial sale shall be made payable to the circuit clerk. Proceedings on the bond may be had in the name of the clerk to whom it is made payable on the relation of the person interested, and the person interested shall be responsible for the costs. The performance of the bond may be summarily enforced by orders of court, and by proceedings for contempt.

History.

1012: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 62, § 129; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 463, effective January 2, 1978.

451.190.
Taxes on property sold at judicial sale.

The court may, in actions for sale of real property, determine summarily, with or without written pleadings, the amount of any state, city or district taxes or assessments upon the property to be sold, and shall provide for their payment in the judgment. If the judgment does not so provide, the purchaser shall be entitled, at any time before the payment of the purchase price, to a credit for the amount of the taxes and assessments.

History.

989.

451.200.
Liability of receiver or depository of court.

A liability incurred by any person as receiver or depository of money or property committed to his charge by order of the court shall rank with debts due to the state and shall have priority over other debts owed by the receiver or depository and precedence over any mortgage or lien upon the property of the receiver or depository made after his appointment or designation.

History.

1013.

451.210.
Record of fiduciaries’ settlements — Fees. [Repealed.]

451.220.
Objection to bail for insufficiency. [Repealed.]